Maine, session 132, LD2176.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4651, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2025, c. 400, §1 and c.
417, §1, is further amended to read:
C. A single act or course of conduct constituting a violation of section 4681; Title 14,
section 6025-B or 9102; Title 17, section 2931; or Title 17‑A, section 201, 202, 203,
204, 207, 208, 209, 210, 210‑A, 211, 253, 254, 255‑A, 256, 258, 259‑A, 259‑B, 260,
261, 282, 283, 301, 302, 303, 506, 506‑A, 511, 511‑A, 556, 802, 805, 806, 852 or 853;
or
Sec. 2. 14 MRSA §6025, sub-§3, as amended by PL 1999, c. 204, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Remedy. If a landlord makes an entry in violation of this section, makes a lawful
entry in an unreasonable manner or makes repeated demands for entry otherwise lawful
that have the effect of harassing the tenant, the tenant may recover actual damages or $100
$250, whichever is greater, and obtain injunctive relief to prevent recurrence of the conduct,
and if the tenant obtains a judgment after a contested hearing, reasonable attorney's fees.
If a tenant changes the lock and does not provide the landlord with a duplicate key, in the
case of emergency the landlord may gain admission through whatever reasonable means
necessary and charge the tenant reasonable costs for any resulting damage. If a tenant
changes the lock and refuses to provide the landlord with a duplicate key, the landlord may
terminate the tenancy with a 7-day notice.
Sec. 3. 14 MRSA §6025-B is enacted to read:
§6025-B. Disclosure of information
1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, "personal information" means the
following information about a tenant, prospective tenant, occupant or prospective occupant
of a rental property:
Page 1 - 132LR2714(04)

A. Identifying information, including name, address, telephone number or e-mail
address;
B. Information about racial or ethnic origins, religious beliefs, health conditions,
sexual activity, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship,
immigration status or alien registration number;
C. A social security number, driver's license number or nondriver identification card
number;
D. Billing, financial or payment method information; or
E. Information concerning an individual's status as a victim of a crime. For the
purposes of this paragraph, "victim" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section
2101, subsection 2.
2. Prohibition. Except as provided in subsection 3, a landlord, a landlord's agent and
any other person acting under the direction of the landlord may not, with the intent to
harass, intimidate or otherwise cause a person to vacate a rental property outside of the
judicial process as established in chapter 709, and without a legitimate business purpose,
disclose to any person the personal information of a known tenant, prospective tenant,
occupant or prospective occupant of a rental property owned or managed by the landlord
without the express consent of the known or prospective tenant or occupant.
3. Exceptions. Notwithstanding subsection 2, a landlord, a landlord's agent and any
other person acting under the direction of the landlord may disclose the personal
information of a tenant, prospective tenant, occupant or prospective occupant of the rental
property owned or managed by the landlord if the disclosure is:
A. In response to a valid discovery request, subpoena or judicial warrant with respect
to any state administrative proceeding, state or federal judicial proceeding or state or
federal criminal investigation;
B. Made to a state, local or county law enforcement agency in the State due to exigent
circumstances or as reasonably necessary to prevent or prosecute a criminal act;
C. Reasonably necessary for the sale or refinancing of the property subject to the
tenancy;
D. Reasonably necessary for the application for or receipt of funds and services related
to federally supported or state-supported affordable housing programs; or
E. Reasonably necessary to respond to a request from a municipal code enforcement
officer, fire inspector or similar municipal officer.
4. Remedy. If a landlord, a landlord's agent or any other person acting under the
direction of the landlord discloses personal information in violation of this section, the
tenant, prospective tenant, occupant or prospective occupant whose personal information
was disclosed may recover actual damages or $1,000, whichever is greater, and obtain
injunctive relief to prevent the recurrence of the conduct. If the tenant, prospective tenant,
occupant or prospective occupant obtains a judgment after a contested hearing, the tenant,
prospective tenant, occupant or prospective occupant whose personal information was
disclosed may recover reasonable attorney's fees.
Page 2 - 132LR2714(04)